Louisiana, session 2026, HB84.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:2(B)(63) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2. Definitions
* * *
B. In this Code, "crime of violence" means an offense that has, as an
element, the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the
person or property of another, and that, by its very nature, involves a substantial risk
that physical force against the person or property of another may be used in the
course of committing the offense or an offense that involves the possession or use
of a dangerous weapon. The following enumerated offenses and attempts to commit
any of them are included as "crimes of violence":
* * *
(63) Hit-and-run driving punishable under R.S. 14:100(C)(2) or (3).
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 890.1(D)(35) and 890.3(C)(28) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-249 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 84
Art. 890.1. Waiver of minimum mandatory sentences; procedure; exceptions
* * *
D. The provisions of this Article shall not apply to a sex offense as defined
in R.S. 15:541 or to any of the following crimes of violence:
* * *
(35) R.S. 14:100(C)(2) or (3) (Hit-and-run driving).
* * *
Art. 890.3. Sentencing for crimes of violence
* * *
C. The following crimes of violence enumerated in R.S. 14:2(B) shall always
be designated by the court in the minutes as a crime of violence:
* * *
(28) Hit-and-run driving punishable under R.S. 14:100(C)(2) or (3).
Section 3. This Act shall be cited and referred to as "The Christina Larsen Act".